Ohio, session 136, HB273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 319.302, 323.152, and 4503.06 of 6
the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: 7
Sec. 319.302. (A)(1) Real property that is not intended 8
primarily for use in a business activity farming shall qualify 9
for a partial exemption from real property taxation. For 10
purposes of this partial exemption, "business activity" includes 11
all uses of real property, except farming; leasing property for 12
farming; occupying or holding property improved with single- 13
family, two-family, or three-family dwellings; leasing property 14
improved with single-family, two-family, or three-family 15
dwellings; or holding vacant land that the county auditor 16
determines will be used for farming or to develop single-family, 17
two-family, or three-family dwellings. For purposes of this 18
partial exemption, "farming" includes leasing property for 19
farming and holding vacant land that the county auditor 20
determines will be used for farming but does not include land 21

H. B. No. 273 Page 2
As Introduced
used for the commercial production of timber that is receiving 22
the tax benefit under section 5713.23 or 5713.31 of the Revised 23
Code and all improvements connected with such commercial 24
production of timber. 25
(2) Each year, the county auditor shall review each parcel 26
of real property to determine whether it qualifies for the 27
partial exemption provided for by this section as of the first 28
day of January of the current tax year. 29
(B) After complying with section 319.301 of the Revised 30
Code, the county auditor shall reduce the remaining sums to be 31
levied by qualifying levies against each parcel of real property 32
that is listed on the general tax list and duplicate of real and 33
public utility property for the current tax year and that 34
qualifies for partial exemption under division (A) of this 35
section, and against each manufactured and mobile home that is 36
taxed pursuant to division (D)(2) of section 4503.06 of the 37
Revised Code and that is on the manufactured home tax list for 38
the current tax year, by ten per cent, to provide a partial 39
exemption for that parcel or home. For the purposes of this 40
division: 41
(1) "Qualifying levy" means a levy approved at an election 42
held before September 29, 2013; a levy within the ten-mill 43
limitation; a levy provided for by the charter of a municipal 44
corporation that was levied on the tax list for tax year 2013; a 45
subsequent renewal of any such levy; or a subsequent substitute 46
for such a levy under section 5705.199 of the Revised Code. 47
(2) "Qualifying levy" does not include any replacement 48
imposed under section 5705.192 of the Revised Code of any levy 49
described in division (B)(1) of this section. 50

H. B. No. 273 Page 3
As Introduced
(C) Except as otherwise provided in sections 323.152, 51
323.158, 323.16, 505.06, and 715.263 of the Revised Code, the 52
amount of the taxes remaining after any such reduction shall be 53
the real and public utility property taxes charged and payable 54
on each parcel of real property, including property that does 55
not qualify for partial exemption under division (A) of this 56
section, and the manufactured home tax charged and payable on 57
each manufactured or mobile home, and shall be the amounts 58
certified to the county treasurer for collection. Upon receipt 59
of the real and public utility property tax duplicate, the 60
treasurer shall certify to the tax commissioner the total amount 61
by which the real property taxes were reduced under this 62
section, as shown on the duplicate. Such reduction shall not 63
directly or indirectly affect the determination of the principal 64
amount of notes that may be issued in anticipation of any tax 65
levies or the amount of bonds or notes for any planned 66
improvements. If after application of sections 5705.31 and 67
5705.32 of the Revised Code and other applicable provisions of 68
law, including divisions (F) and (I) of section 321.24 of the 69
Revised Code, there would be insufficient funds for payment of 70
debt charges on bonds or notes payable from taxes reduced by 71
this section, the reduction of taxes provided for in this 72
section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary to provide 73
funds from such taxes. 74
(D) The tax commissioner may adopt rules governing the 75
administration of the partial exemption provided for by this 76
section. 77
(E) The determination of whether property qualifies for 78
partial exemption under division (A) of this section is solely 79
for the purpose of allowing the partial exemption under division 80
(B) of this section. 81

H. B. No. 273 Page 4
As Introduced
Sec. 323.152. In addition to the reduction in taxes 82
required under section 319.302 of the Revised Code, taxes shall 83
be reduced as provided in divisions (A) and (B) of this section. 84
(A)(1)(a) Division (A)(1) of this section applies to any 85
of the following persons: 86
(i) A person who is permanently and totally disabled; 87
(ii) A person who is sixty-five years of age or older; 88
(iii) A person who is the surviving spouse of a deceased 89
person who was permanently and totally disabled or sixty-five 90
years of age or older and who applied and qualified for a 91
reduction in taxes under this division in the year of death, 92
provided the surviving spouse is at least fifty-nine but not 93
sixty-five or more years of age on the date the deceased spouse 94
dies. 95
(b) Real property taxes on a homestead owned and occupied, 96
or a homestead in a housing cooperative occupied, by a person to 97
whom division (A)(1) of this section applies shall be reduced 98
for each year for which an application for the reduction has 99
been approved. The reduction shall equal one of the following 100
amounts, as applicable to the person: 101
(i) If the person received a reduction under division (A) 102
(1) of this section for tax year 2006, the greater of the 103
reduction for that tax year or the amount computed under 104
division (A)(1)(c) of this section; 105
(ii) If the person received, for any homestead, a 106
reduction under division (A)(1) of this section for tax year 107
2013 or under division (A) of section 4503.065 of the Revised 108
Code for tax year 2014 or the person is the surviving spouse of 109
such a person and the surviving spouse is at least fifty-nine 110

H. B. No. 273 Page 5
As Introduced
years of age on the date the deceased spouse dies, the amount 111
computed under division (A)(1)(c) of this section. 112
(iii) If the person is not described in division (A)(1)(b) 113
(i) or (ii) of this section and the person's total income does 114
not exceed thirty thousand dollars, as adjusted under division 115
(A)(1)(d) of this section, the amount computed under division 116
(A)(1)(c) of this section. 117
(c) The amount of the reduction under division (A)(1)(c) 118
of this section equals the product of the following: 119
(i) Twenty-five thousand dollars of the true value of the 120
property in money, as adjusted under division (A)(1)(d) of this 121
section; 122
(ii) The assessment percentage established by the tax 123
commissioner under division (B) of section 5715.01 of the 124
Revised Code, not to exceed thirty-five per cent; 125
(iii) The effective tax rate used to calculate the taxes 126
charged against the property for the current year, where 127
"effective tax rate" is defined as in section 323.08 of the 128
Revised Code; 129
(iv) The quantity equal to one minus the sum of the 130
percentage reductions in taxes received by the property for the 131
current tax year under section 319.302 of the Revised Code and 132
division (B) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code. 133
(d) The tax commissioner shall adjust the total income 134
threshold described in division (A)(1)(b)(iii) and the reduction 135
amounts described in divisions (A)(1)(c)(i), (A)(2), and (A)(3) 136
of this section by completing the following calculations in 137
September of each year: 138

H. B. No. 273 Page 6
As Introduced
(i) Determine the percentage increase in the gross 139
domestic product deflator determined by the bureau of economic 140
analysis of the United States department of commerce from the 141
first day of January of the preceding calendar year to the last 142
day of December of the preceding calendar year; 143
(ii) Multiply that percentage increase by the total income 144
threshold or reduction amount for the current tax year, as 145
applicable; 146
(iii) Add the resulting product to the total income 147
threshold or the reduction amount, as applicable, for the 148
current tax year; 149
(iv) Round the resulting sum to the nearest multiple of 150
one hundred dollars. 151
The commissioner shall certify the amount resulting from 152
each adjustment to each county auditor not later than the first 153
day of December each year. The certified total income threshold 154
amount applies to the following tax year for persons described 155
in division (A)(1)(b)(iii) of this section. The certified 156
reduction amount applies to the following tax year. The 157
commissioner shall not make the applicable adjustment in any 158
calendar year in which the amount resulting from the adjustment 159
would be less than the total income threshold or the reduction 160
amount for the current tax year. 161
(2)(a) Real property taxes on a homestead owned and 162
occupied, or a homestead in a housing cooperative occupied, by a 163
disabled veteran shall be reduced for each year for which an 164
application for the reduction has been approved. The reduction 165
shall equal the product obtained by multiplying fifty thousand 166
dollars of the true value of the property in money, as adjusted 167

H. B. No. 273 Page 7
As Introduced
under division (A)(1)(d) of this section, by the amounts 168
described in divisions (A)(1)(c)(ii) to (iv) of this section. 169
The reduction is in lieu of any reduction under section 323.158 170
of the Revised Code or division (A)(1), (2)(b), or (3) of this 171
section. The reduction applies to only one homestead owned and 172
occupied by a disabled veteran. 173
(b) Real property taxes on a homestead owned and occupied, 174
or a homestead in a housing cooperative occupied, by the 175
surviving spouse of a disabled veteran shall be reduced for each 176
year an application for exemption is approved. The reduction 177
shall equal to the amount of the reduction authorized under 178
division (A)(2)(a) of this section. 179
The reduction is in lieu of any reduction under section 180
323.158 of the Revised Code or division (A)(1), (2)(a), or (3) 181
of this section. The reduction applies to only one homestead 182
owned and occupied by the surviving spouse of a disabled 183
veteran. A homestead qualifies for a reduction in taxes under 184
division (A)(2)(b) of this section beginning in one of the 185
following tax years: 186
(i) For a surviving spouse described in division (L)(1) of 187
section 323.151 of the Revised Code, the year the disabled 188
veteran dies; 189
(ii) For a surviving spouse described in division (L)(2) 190
of section 323.151 of the Revised Code, the first year on the 191
first day of January of which the total disability rating 192
described in division (F) of that section has been received for 193
the deceased spouse. 194
In either case, the reduction shall continue through the 195
tax year in which the surviving spouse dies or remarries. 196

H. B. No. 273 Page 8
As Introduced
(3) Real property taxes on a homestead owned and occupied, 197
or a homestead in a housing cooperative occupied, by the 198
surviving spouse of a public service officer killed in the line 199
of duty shall be reduced for each year for which an application 200
for the reduction has been approved. The reduction shall equal 201
the product obtained by multiplying fifty thousand dollars of 202
the true value of the property in money, as adjusted under 203
division (A)(1)(d) of this section, by the amounts described in 204
divisions (A)(1)(c)(ii) to (iv) of this section. The reduction 205
is in lieu of any reduction under section 323.158 of the Revised 206
Code or division (A)(1) or (2) of this section. The reduction 207
applies to only one homestead owned and occupied by such a 208
surviving spouse. A homestead qualifies for a reduction in taxes 209
under division (A)(3) of this section for the tax year in which 210
the public service officer dies through the tax year in which 211
the surviving spouse dies or remarries. 212
(B) To provide a partial exemption, real property taxes on 213
any homestead, and manufactured home taxes on any manufactured 214
or mobile home on which a manufactured home tax is assessed 215
pursuant to division (D)(2) of section 4503.06 of the Revised 216
Code, shall be reduced for each year for which an application 217
for the reduction has been approved. The amount of the reduction 218
shall equal two the sum of seventy-five dollars plus twelve and 219
one-half per cent of the amount of taxes to be levied by 220
qualifying levies on the homestead or the manufactured or mobile 221
home after applying section 319.301 of the Revised Code. For the 222
purposes of this division, "qualifying levy" has the same 223
meaning as in section 319.302 of the Revised Code. 224
(C) The reductions granted by this section do not apply to 225
special assessments or respread of assessments levied against 226
the homestead, and if there is a transfer of ownership 227

H. B. No. 273 Page 9
As Introduced
subsequent to the filing of an application for a reduction in 228
taxes, such reductions are not forfeited for such year by virtue 229
of such transfer. 230
(D) The reductions in taxable value referred to in this 231
section shall be applied solely as a factor for the purpose of 232
computing the reduction of taxes under this section and shall 233
not affect the total value of property in any subdivision or 234
taxing district as listed and assessed for taxation on the tax 235
lists and duplicates, or any direct or indirect limitations on 236
indebtedness of a subdivision or taxing district. If after 237
application of sections 5705.31 and 5705.32 of the Revised Code, 238
including the allocation of all levies within the ten-mill 239
limitation to debt charges to the extent therein provided, there 240
would be insufficient funds for payment of debt charges not 241
provided for by levies in excess of the ten-mill limitation, the 242
reduction of taxes provided for in sections 323.151 to 323.159 243
of the Revised Code shall be proportionately adjusted to the 244
extent necessary to provide such funds from levies within the 245
ten-mill limitation. 246
(E) No reduction shall be made on the taxes due on the 247
homestead of any person convicted of violating division (D) or 248
(E) of section 323.153 of the Revised Code for a period of three 249
years following the conviction. 250
Sec. 4503.06. (A) The owner of each manufactured or mobile 251
home that has acquired situs in this state shall pay either a 252
real property tax pursuant to Title LVII of the Revised Code or 253
a manufactured home tax pursuant to division (C) of this 254
section. 255
(B) The owner of a manufactured or mobile home shall pay 256
real property taxes if either of the following applies: 257

H. B. No. 273 Page 10
As Introduced
(1) The manufactured or mobile home acquired situs in the 258
state or ownership in the home was transferred on or after 259
January 1, 2000, and all of the following apply: 260
(a) The home is affixed to a permanent foundation as 261
defined in division (C)(5) of section 3781.06 of the Revised 262
Code. 263
(b) The home is located on land that is owned by the owner 264
of the home. 265
(c) The certificate of title has been inactivated by the 266
clerk of the court of common pleas that issued it, pursuant to 267
division (H) of section 4505.11 of the Revised Code. 268
(2) The manufactured or mobile home acquired situs in the 269
state or ownership in the home was transferred before January 1, 270
2000, and all of the following apply: 271
(a) The home is affixed to a permanent foundation as 272
defined in division (C)(5) of section 3781.06 of the Revised 273
Code. 274
(b) The home is located on land that is owned by the owner 275
of the home. 276
(c) The owner of the home has elected to have the home 277
taxed as real property and, pursuant to section 4505.11 of the 278
Revised Code, has surrendered the certificate of title to the 279
auditor of the county containing the taxing district in which 280
the home has its situs, together with proof that all taxes have 281
been paid. 282
(d) The county auditor has placed the home on the real 283
property tax list and delivered the certificate of title to the 284
clerk of the court of common pleas that issued it and the clerk 285

H. B. No. 273 Page 11
As Introduced
has inactivated the certificate. 286
(C)(1) Any mobile or manufactured home that is not taxed 287
as real property as provided in division (B) of this section is 288
subject to an annual manufactured home tax, payable by the 289
owner, for locating the home in this state. The tax as levied in 290
this section is for the purpose of supplementing the general 291
revenue funds of the local subdivisions in which the home has 292
its situs pursuant to this section. 293
(2) The year for which the manufactured home tax is levied 294
commences on the first day of January and ends on the following 295
thirty-first day of December. The state shall have the first 296
lien on any manufactured or mobile home on the list for the 297
amount of taxes, penalties, and interest charged against the 298
owner of the home under this section. The lien of the state for 299
the tax for a year shall attach on the first day of January to a 300
home that has acquired situs on that date. The lien for a home 301
that has not acquired situs on the first day of January, but 302
that acquires situs during the year, shall attach on the next 303
first day of January. The lien shall continue until the tax, 304
including any penalty or interest, is paid. 305
(3)(a) The situs of a manufactured or mobile home located 306
in this state on the first day of January is the local taxing 307
district in which the home is located on that date. 308
(b) The situs of a manufactured or mobile home not located 309
in this state on the first day of January, but located in this 310
state subsequent to that date, is the local taxing district in 311
which the home is located thirty days after it is acquired or 312
first enters this state. 313
(4) The tax is collected by and paid to the county 314

H. B. No. 273 Page 12
As Introduced
treasurer of the county containing the taxing district in which 315
the home has its situs. 316
(D) The manufactured home tax shall be computed and 317
assessed by the county auditor of the county containing the 318
taxing district in which the home has its situs as follows: 319
(1) On a home that acquired situs in this state prior to 320
January 1, 2000: 321
(a) By multiplying the assessable value of the home by the 322
tax rate of the taxing district in which the home has its situs, 323
and deducting from the product thus obtained any reduction 324
authorized under section 4503.065 of the Revised Code. The tax 325
levied under this formula shall not be less than thirty-six 326
dollars, unless the home qualifies for a reduction in assessable 327
value under section 4503.065 of the Revised Code, in which case 328
there shall be no minimum tax and the tax shall be the amount 329
calculated under this division. 330
(b) The assessable value of the home shall be forty per 331
cent of the amount arrived at by the following computation: 332
(i) If the cost to the owner, or market value at time of 333
purchase, whichever is greater, of the home includes the 334
furnishings and equipment, such cost or market value shall be 335
multiplied according to the following schedule: 336
337
1 2 3
A For the first calendar year in which the x 80%
home is owned by the current owner
B 2nd calendar year x 75%

H. B. No. 273 Page 13
As Introduced
C 3rd " x 70%
D 4th " x 65%
E 5th " x 60%
F 6th " x 55%
G 7th " x 50%
H 8th " x 45%
I 9th " x 40%
J 10th and each year thereafter x 35%
The first calendar year means any period between the first 338
day of January and the thirty-first day of December of the first 339
year. 340
(ii) If the cost to the owner, or market value at the time 341
of purchase, whichever is greater, of the home does not include 342
the furnishings and equipment, such cost or market value shall 343
be multiplied according to the following schedule: 344
345
1 2 3
A For the first calendar year in which the x 95%
home is owned by the current owner
B 2nd calendar year x 90%
C 3rd " x 85%
D 4th " x 80%

H. B. No. 273 Page 14
As Introduced
E 5th " x 75%
F 6th " x 70%
G 7th " x 65%
H 8th " x 60%
I 9th " x 55%
J 10th and each year thereafter x 50%
The first calendar year means any period between the first 346
day of January and the thirty-first day of December of the first 347
year. 348
(2) On a home in which ownership was transferred or that 349
first acquired situs in this state on or after January 1, 2000: 350
(a) By multiplying the assessable value of the home by the 351
effective tax rate, as defined in section 323.08 of the Revised 352
Code, for residential real property of the taxing district in 353
which the home has its situs, and deducting from the product 354
thus obtained the reductions required or authorized under 355
section 319.302, division (B) of section 323.152, or section 356
4503.065 of the Revised Code. 357
(b) The assessable value of the home shall be thirty-five 358
per cent of its true value as determined under division (L) of 359
this section. 360
(3) On or before the fifteenth day of January each year, 361
the county auditor shall record the assessable value and the 362
amount of tax on the manufactured or mobile home on the tax list 363
and deliver a duplicate of the list to the county treasurer. In 364

H. B. No. 273 Page 15
As Introduced
the case of an emergency as defined in section 323.17 of the 365
Revised Code, the tax commissioner, by journal entry, may extend 366
the times for delivery of the duplicate for an additional 367
fifteen days upon receiving a written application from the 368
county auditor regarding an extension for the delivery of the 369
duplicate, or from the county treasurer regarding an extension 370
of the time for the billing and collection of taxes. The 371
application shall contain a statement describing the emergency 372
that will cause the unavoidable delay and must be received by 373
the tax commissioner on or before the last day of the month 374
preceding the day delivery of the duplicate is otherwise 375
required. When an extension is granted for delivery of the 376
duplicate, the time period for payment of taxes shall be 377
extended for a like period of time. When a delay in the closing 378
of a tax collection period becomes unavoidable, the tax 379
commissioner, upon application by the county auditor and county 380
treasurer, may order the time for payment of taxes to be 381
extended if the tax commissioner determines that penalties have 382
accrued or would otherwise accrue for reasons beyond the control 383
of the taxpayers of the county. The order shall prescribe the 384
final extended date for payment of taxes for that collection 385
period. 386
(4) After January 1, 1999, the owner of a manufactured or 387
mobile home taxed pursuant to division (D)(1) of this section 388
may elect to have the home taxed pursuant to division (D)(2) of 389
this section by filing a written request with the county auditor 390
of the taxing district in which the home is located on or before 391
the first day of December of any year. Upon the filing of the 392
request, the county auditor shall determine whether all taxes 393
levied under division (D)(1) of this section have been paid, and 394
if those taxes have been paid, the county auditor shall tax the 395

H. B. No. 273 Page 16
As Introduced
manufactured or mobile home pursuant to division (D)(2) of this 396
section commencing in the next tax year. 397
(5) A manufactured or mobile home that acquired situs in 398
this state prior to January 1, 2000, shall be taxed pursuant to 399
division (D)(2) of this section if no manufactured home tax had 400
been paid for the home and the home was not exempted from 401
taxation pursuant to division (E) of this section for the year 402
for which the taxes were not paid. 403
(6)(a) Immediately upon receipt of any manufactured home 404
tax duplicate from the county auditor, but not less than twenty 405
days prior to the last date on which the first one-half taxes 406
may be paid without penalty as prescribed in division (F) of 407
this section, the county treasurer shall cause to be prepared 408
and mailed or delivered to each person charged on that duplicate 409
with taxes, or to an agent designated by such person, the tax 410
bill prescribed by the tax commissioner under division (D)(7) of 411
this section. When taxes are paid by installments, the county 412
treasurer shall mail or deliver to each person charged on such 413
duplicate or the agent designated by that person a second tax 414
bill showing the amount due at the time of the second tax 415
collection. The second half tax bill shall be mailed or 416
delivered at least twenty days prior to the close of the second 417
half tax collection period. A change in the mailing address, 418
electronic mail address, or telephone number of any tax bill 419
shall be made in writing to the county treasurer. Failure to 420
receive a bill required by this section does not excuse failure 421
or delay to pay any taxes shown on the bill or, except as 422
provided in division (B)(1) of section 5715.39 of the Revised 423
Code, avoid any penalty, interest, or charge for such delay. 424
A policy adopted by a county treasurer under division (A) 425

H. B. No. 273 Page 17
As Introduced
(2) of section 323.13 of the Revised Code shall also allow any 426
person required to receive a tax bill under division (D)(6)(a) 427
of this section to request electronic delivery of that tax bill 428
in the same manner. A person may rescind such a request in the 429
same manner as a request made under division (A)(2) of section 430
323.13 of the Revised Code. The request shall terminate upon a 431
change in the name of the person charged with the taxes pursuant 432
to section 4503.061 of the Revised Code. 433
(b) After delivery of the copy of the delinquent 434
manufactured home tax list under division (H) of this section, 435
the county treasurer may prepare and mail to each person in 436
whose name a home is listed an additional tax bill showing the 437
total amount of delinquent taxes charged against the home as 438
shown on the list. The tax bill shall include a notice that the 439
interest charge prescribed by division (G) of this section has 440
begun to accrue. 441
(7) Each tax bill prepared and mailed or delivered under 442
division (D)(6) of this section shall be in the form and contain 443
the information required by the tax commissioner. The 444
commissioner may prescribe different forms for each county and 445
may authorize the county auditor to make up tax bills and tax 446
receipts to be used by the county treasurer. The tax bill shall 447
not contain or be mailed or delivered with any information or 448
material that is not required by this section or that is not 449
authorized by section 321.45 of the Revised Code or by the tax 450
commissioner. In addition to the information required by the 451
commissioner, each tax bill shall contain the following 452
information: 453
(a) The taxes levied and the taxes charged and payable 454
against the manufactured or mobile home; 455

H. B. No. 273 Page 18
As Introduced
(b) The following notice: "Notice: If the taxes are not 456
paid within sixty days after the county auditor delivers the 457
delinquent manufactured home tax list to the county treasurer, 458
you and your home may be subject to collection proceedings for 459
tax delinquency." Failure to provide such notice has no effect 460
upon the validity of any tax judgment to which a home may be 461
subjected. 462
(c) In the case of manufactured or mobile homes taxed 463
under division (D)(2) of this section, the following additional 464
information: 465
(i) The effective tax rate. The words "effective tax rate" 466
shall appear in boldface type. 467
(ii) The following notice: "Notice: If the taxes charged 468
against this home have been reduced by the 2-1/2 per cent tax 469
reduction for residences occupied by the owner but the home is 470
not a residence occupied by the owner, the owner must notify the 471
county auditor's office not later than March 31 of the year for 472
which the taxes are due. Failure to do so may result in the 473
owner being convicted of a fourth degree misdemeanor, which is 474
punishable by imprisonment up to 30 days, a fine up to $250, or 475
both, and in the owner having to repay the amount by which the 476
taxes were erroneously or illegally reduced, plus any interest 477
that may apply. 478
If the taxes charged against this home have not been 479
reduced by the 2-1/2 per cent tax reduction and the home is a 480
residence occupied by the owner, the home may qualify for the 481
tax reduction. To obtain an application for the tax reduction or 482
further information, the owner may contact the county auditor's 483
office at __________ (insert the address and telephone number of 484
the county auditor's office)." 485

H. B. No. 273 Page 19
As Introduced
(E)(1) A manufactured or mobile home is not subject to 486
this section when any of the following applies: 487
(a) It is taxable as personal property pursuant to section 488
5709.01 of the Revised Code. Any manufactured or mobile home 489
that is used as a residence shall be subject to this section and 490
shall not be taxable as personal property pursuant to section 491
5709.01 of the Revised Code. 492
(b) It bears a license plate issued by any state other 493
than this state unless the home is in this state in excess of an 494
accumulative period of thirty days in any calendar year. 495
(c) The annual tax has been paid on the home in this state 496
for the current year. 497
(d) The tax commissioner has determined, pursuant to 498
section 5715.27 of the Revised Code, that the property is exempt 499
from taxation, or would be exempt from taxation under Chapter 500
5709. of the Revised Code if it were classified as real 501
property. 502
(2) A travel trailer or park trailer, as these terms are 503
defined in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code, is not subject 504
to this section if it is unused or unoccupied and stored at the 505
owner's normal place of residence or at a recognized storage 506
facility. 507
(3) A travel trailer or park trailer, as these terms are 508
defined in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code, is subject to 509
this section and shall be taxed as a manufactured or mobile home 510
if it has a situs longer than thirty days in one location and is 511
connected to existing utilities, unless either of the following 512
applies: 513
(a) The situs is in a state facility or a camping or park 514

H. B. No. 273 Page 20
As Introduced
area as defined in division (C), (Q), (S), or (V) of section 515
3729.01 of the Revised Code. 516
(b) The situs is in a camping or park area that is a tract 517
of land that has been limited to recreational use by deed or 518
zoning restrictions and subdivided for sale of five or more 519
individual lots for the express or implied purpose of occupancy 520
by either self-contained recreational vehicles as defined in 521
division (T) of section 3729.01 of the Revised Code or by 522
dependent recreational vehicles as defined in division (D) of 523
section 3729.01 of the Revised Code. 524
(F) Except as provided in division (D)(3) of this section, 525
the manufactured home tax is due and payable as follows: 526
(1) When a manufactured or mobile home has a situs in this 527
state, as provided in this section, on the first day of January, 528
one-half of the amount of the tax is due and payable on or 529
before the first day of March and the balance is due and payable 530
on or before the thirty-first day of July. At the option of the 531
owner of the home, the tax for the entire year may be paid in 532
full on the first day of March. 533
(2) When a manufactured or mobile home first acquires a 534
situs in this state after the first day of January, no tax is 535
due and payable for that year. 536
(G)(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (G)(1) 537
(b) of this section, if one-half of the current taxes charged 538
under this section against a manufactured or mobile home, 539
together with the full amount of any delinquent taxes, are not 540
paid on or before the first day of March in that year, or on or 541
before the last day for such payment as extended pursuant to 542
section 4503.063 of the Revised Code, a penalty of ten per cent 543

H. B. No. 273 Page 21
As Introduced
shall be charged against the unpaid balance of such half of the 544
current taxes. If the total amount of all such taxes is not paid 545
on or before the thirty-first day of July, next thereafter, or 546
on or before the last day for payment as extended pursuant to 547
section 4503.063 of the Revised Code, a like penalty shall be 548
charged on the balance of the total amount of the unpaid current 549
taxes. 550
(b) After a valid delinquent tax contract that includes 551
unpaid current taxes from a first-half collection period 552
described in division (F) of this section has been entered into 553
under section 323.31 of the Revised Code, no ten per cent 554
penalty shall be charged against such taxes after the second- 555
half collection period while the delinquent tax contract remains 556
in effect. On the day a delinquent tax contract becomes void, 557
the ten per cent penalty shall be charged against such taxes and 558
shall equal the amount of penalty that would have been charged 559
against unpaid current taxes outstanding on the date on which 560
the second-half penalty would have been charged thereon under 561
division (G)(1)(a) of this section if the contract had not been 562
in effect. 563
(2)(a) On the first day of the month following the last 564
day the second installment of taxes may be paid without penalty 565
beginning in 2000, interest shall be charged against and 566
computed on all delinquent taxes other than the current taxes 567
that became delinquent taxes at the close of the last day such 568
second installment could be paid without penalty. The charge 569
shall be for interest that accrued during the period that began 570
on the preceding first day of December and ended on the last day 571
of the month that included the last date such second installment 572
could be paid without penalty. The interest shall be computed at 573
the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised 574

H. B. No. 273 Page 22
As Introduced
Code and shall be entered as a separate item on the delinquent 575
manufactured home tax list compiled under division (H) of this 576
section. 577
(b) On the first day of December beginning in 2000, the 578
interest shall be charged against and computed on all delinquent 579
taxes. The charge shall be for interest that accrued during the 580
period that began on the first day of the month following the 581
last date prescribed for the payment of the second installment 582
of taxes in the current year and ended on the immediately 583
preceding last day of November. The interest shall be computed 584
at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the 585
Revised Code and shall be entered as a separate item on the 586
delinquent manufactured home tax list. 587
(c) After a valid undertaking has been entered into for 588
the payment of any delinquent taxes, no interest shall be 589
charged against such delinquent taxes while the undertaking 590
remains in effect in compliance with section 323.31 of the 591
Revised Code. If a valid undertaking becomes void, interest 592
shall be charged against the delinquent taxes for the periods 593
that interest was not permitted to be charged while the 594
undertaking was in effect. The interest shall be charged on the 595
day the undertaking becomes void and shall equal the amount of 596
interest that would have been charged against the unpaid 597
delinquent taxes outstanding on the dates on which interest 598
would have been charged thereon under divisions (G)(1) and (2) 599
of this section had the undertaking not been in effect. 600
(3) If the full amount of the taxes due at either of the 601
times prescribed by division (F) of this section is paid within 602
ten days after such time, the county treasurer shall waive the 603
collection of and the county auditor shall remit one-half of the 604

H. B. No. 273 Page 23
As Introduced
penalty provided for in this division for failure to make that 605
payment by the prescribed time. 606
(4) The treasurer shall compile and deliver to the county 607
auditor a list of all tax payments the treasurer has received as 608
provided in division (G)(3) of this section. The list shall 609
include any information required by the auditor for the 610
remission of the penalties waived by the treasurer. The taxes so 611
collected shall be included in the settlement next succeeding 612
the settlement then in process. 613
(H)(1) The county auditor shall compile annually a 614
"delinquent manufactured home tax list" consisting of homes the 615
county treasurer's records indicate have taxes that were not 616
paid within the time prescribed by divisions (D)(3) and (F) of 617
this section, have taxes that remain unpaid from prior years, or 618
have unpaid tax penalties or interest that have been assessed. 619
(2) Within thirty days after the settlement under division 620
(H)(2) of section 321.24 of the Revised Code, the county auditor 621
shall deliver a copy of the delinquent manufactured home tax 622
list to the county treasurer. The auditor shall update and 623
publish the delinquent manufactured home tax list annually in 624
the same manner as delinquent real property tax lists are 625
published. The county auditor may apportion the cost of 626
publishing the list among taxing districts in proportion to the 627
amount of delinquent manufactured home taxes so published that 628
each taxing district is entitled to receive upon collection of 629
those taxes, or the county auditor may charge the owner of a 630
home on the list a flat fee established under section 319.54 of 631
the Revised Code for the cost of publishing the list and, if the 632
fee is not paid, may place the fee upon the delinquent 633
manufactured home tax list as a lien on the listed home, to be 634

H. B. No. 273 Page 24
As Introduced
collected as other manufactured home taxes. 635
(3) When taxes, penalties, or interest are charged against 636
a person on the delinquent manufactured home tax list and are 637
not paid within sixty days after the list is delivered to the 638
county treasurer, the county treasurer shall, in addition to any 639
other remedy provided by law for the collection of taxes, 640
penalties, and interest, enforce collection of such taxes, 641
penalties, and interest by civil action in the name of the 642
treasurer against the owner for the recovery of the unpaid taxes 643
following the procedures for the recovery of delinquent real 644
property taxes in sections 323.25 to 323.28 of the Revised Code. 645
The action may be brought in municipal or county court, provided 646
the amount charged does not exceed the monetary limitations for 647
original jurisdiction for civil actions in those courts. 648
It is sufficient, having made proper parties to the suit, 649
for the county treasurer to allege in the treasurer's bill of 650
particulars or petition that the taxes stand chargeable on the 651
books of the county treasurer against such person, that they are 652
due and unpaid, and that such person is indebted in the amount 653
of taxes appearing to be due the county. The treasurer need not 654
set forth any other matter relating thereto. If it is found on 655
the trial of the action that the person is indebted to the 656
state, judgment shall be rendered in favor of the county 657
treasurer prosecuting the action. The judgment debtor is not 658
entitled to the benefit of any law for stay of execution or 659
exemption of property from levy or sale on execution in the 660
enforcement of the judgment. 661
Upon the filing of an entry of confirmation of sale or an 662
order of forfeiture in a proceeding brought under this division, 663
title to the manufactured or mobile home shall be in the 664

H. B. No. 273 Page 25
As Introduced
purchaser. The clerk of courts shall issue a certificate of 665
title to the purchaser upon presentation of proof of filing of 666
the entry of confirmation or order and, in the case of a 667
forfeiture, presentation of the county auditor's certificate of 668
sale. 669
(I) The total amount of taxes collected shall be 670
distributed in the following manner: four per cent shall be 671
allowed as compensation to the county auditor for the county 672
auditor's service in assessing the taxes; two per cent shall be 673
allowed as compensation to the county treasurer for the services 674
the county treasurer renders as a result of the tax levied by 675
this section. Such amounts shall be paid into the county 676
treasury, to the credit of the county general revenue fund, on 677
the warrant of the county auditor. Fees to be paid to the credit 678
of the real estate assessment fund shall be collected pursuant 679
to division (C) of section 319.54 of the Revised Code and paid 680
into the county treasury, on the warrant of the county auditor. 681
The balance of the taxes collected shall be distributed among 682
the taxing subdivisions of the county in which the taxes are 683
collected and paid in the same proportions that the amount of 684
manufactured home tax levied by each taxing subdivision of the 685
county in the current tax year bears to the amount of such tax 686
levied by all such subdivisions in the county in the current tax 687
year. The taxes levied and revenues collected under this section 688
shall be in lieu of any general property tax and any tax levied 689
with respect to the privilege of using or occupying a 690
manufactured or mobile home in this state except as provided in 691
sections 4503.04 and 5741.02 of the Revised Code. 692
(J) An agreement to purchase or a bill of sale for a 693
manufactured home shall show whether or not the furnishings and 694
equipment are included in the purchase price. 695

H. B. No. 273 Page 26
As Introduced
(K) If the county treasurer and the county prosecuting 696
attorney agree that an item charged on the delinquent 697
manufactured home tax list is uncollectible, they shall certify 698
that determination and the reasons to the county board of 699
revision. If the board determines the amount is uncollectible, 700
it shall certify its determination to the county auditor, who 701
shall strike the item from the list. 702
(L)(1) The county auditor shall appraise at its true value 703
any manufactured or mobile home in which ownership is 704
transferred or which first acquires situs in this state on or 705
after January 1, 2000, and any manufactured or mobile home the 706
owner of which has elected, under division (D)(4) of this 707
section, to have the home taxed under division (D)(2) of this 708
section. The true value shall include the value of the home, any 709
additions, and any fixtures, but not any furnishings in the 710
home. In determining the true value of a manufactured or mobile 711
home, the auditor shall consider all facts and circumstances 712
relating to the value of the home, including its age, its 713
capacity to function as a residence, any obsolete 714
characteristics, and other factors that may tend to prove its 715
true value. 716
(2)(a) If a manufactured or mobile home has been the 717
subject of an arm's length sale between a willing seller and a 718
willing buyer within a reasonable length of time prior to the 719
determination of true value, the county auditor shall consider 720
the sale price of the home to be the true value for taxation 721
purposes. 722
(b) The sale price in an arm's length transaction between 723
a willing seller and a willing buyer shall not be considered the 724
true value of the home if either of the following occurred after 725

H. B. No. 273 Page 27
As Introduced
the sale: 726
(i) The home has lost value due to a casualty. 727
(ii) An addition or fixture has been added to the home. 728
(3) The county auditor shall have each home viewed and 729
appraised at least once in each six-year period in the same year 730
in which real property in the county is appraised pursuant to 731
Chapter 5713. of the Revised Code, and shall update the 732
appraised values in the third calendar year following the 733
appraisal. The person viewing or appraising a home may enter the 734
home to determine by actual view any additions or fixtures that 735
have been added since the last appraisal. In conducting the 736
appraisals and establishing the true value, the auditor shall 737
follow the procedures set forth for appraising real property in 738
sections 5713.01 and 5713.03 of the Revised Code. 739
(4) The county auditor shall place the true value of each 740
home on the manufactured home tax list upon completion of an 741
appraisal. 742
(5)(a) If the county auditor changes the true value of a 743
home, the auditor shall notify the owner of the home in writing, 744
delivered by mail or in person. The notice shall be given at 745
least thirty days prior to the issuance of any tax bill that 746
reflects the change. Failure to receive the notice does not 747
invalidate any proceeding under this section. 748
(b) Any owner of a home or any other person or party that 749
would be authorized to file a complaint under division (A) of 750
section 5715.19 of the Revised Code if the home was real 751
property may file a complaint against the true value of the home 752
as appraised under this section. The complaint shall be filed 753
with the county auditor on or before the thirty-first day of 754

H. B. No. 273 Page 28
As Introduced
March of the current tax year or the date of closing of the 755
collection for the first half of manufactured home taxes for the 756
current tax year, whichever is later. The auditor shall present 757
to the county board of revision all complaints filed with the 758
auditor under this section. The board shall hear and investigate 759
the complaint and may take action on it as provided under 760
sections 5715.11 to 5715.19 of the Revised Code. 761
(c) If the county board of revision determines, pursuant 762
to a complaint against the valuation of a manufactured or mobile 763
home filed under this section, that the amount of taxes, 764
assessments, or other charges paid was in excess of the amount 765
due based on the valuation as finally determined, then the 766
overpayment shall be refunded in the manner prescribed in 767
section 5715.22 of the Revised Code. 768
(d) Payment of all or part of a tax under this section for 769
any year for which a complaint is pending before the county 770
board of revision does not abate the complaint or in any way 771
affect the hearing and determination thereof. 772
(M) If the county auditor determines that any tax or other 773
charge or any part thereof has been erroneously charged as a 774
result of a clerical error as defined in section 319.35 of the 775
Revised Code, the county auditor shall call the attention of the 776
county board of revision to the erroneous charges. If the board 777
finds that the taxes or other charges have been erroneously 778
charged or collected, it shall certify the finding to the 779
auditor. Upon receipt of the certification, the auditor shall 780
remove the erroneous charges on the manufactured home tax list 781
or delinquent manufactured home tax list in the same manner as 782
is prescribed in section 319.35 of the Revised Code for 783
erroneous charges against real property, and refund any 784

H. B. No. 273 Page 29
As Introduced
erroneous charges that have been collected, with interest, in 785
the same manner as is prescribed in section 319.36 of the 786
Revised Code for erroneous charges against real property. 787
(N) As used in this section and section 4503.061 of the 788
Revised Code: 789
(1) "Manufactured home taxes" includes taxes, penalties, 790
and interest charged under division (C) or (G) of this section 791
and any penalties charged under division (G) or (H)(5) of 792
section 4503.061 of the Revised Code. 793
(2) "Current taxes" means all manufactured home taxes 794
charged against a manufactured or mobile home that have not 795
appeared on the manufactured home tax list for any prior year. 796
Current taxes become delinquent taxes if they remain unpaid 797
after the last day prescribed for payment of the second 798
installment of current taxes without penalty, whether or not 799
they have been certified delinquent. 800
(3) "Delinquent taxes" means: 801
(a) Any manufactured home taxes that were charged against 802
a manufactured or mobile home for a prior year, including any 803
penalties or interest charged for a prior year and the costs of 804
publication under division (H)(2) of this section, and that 805
remain unpaid; 806
(b) Any current manufactured home taxes charged against a 807
manufactured or mobile home that remain unpaid after the last 808
day prescribed for payment of the second installment of current 809
taxes without penalty, whether or not they have been certified 810
delinquent, including any penalties or interest and the costs of 811
publication under division (H)(2) of this section. 812
Section 2. That existing sections 319.302, 323.152, and 813

H. B. No. 273 Page 30
As Introduced
4503.06 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 814
Section 3. The amendment by this act of sections 319.302, 815
323.152, and 4503.06 of the Revised Code applies, in the case of 816
property on the real property tax list, to tax years ending on 817
or after the effective date of this section and, in the case of 818
property on the manufactured home tax list, to tax years 819
beginning on or after the effective date of this section. 820
Section 4. Section 323.152 of the Revised Code is 821
presented in this act as a composite of the section as amended 822
by both H.B. 33 and S.B. 43 of the 135th General Assembly. The 823
General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) 824
of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be 825
harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, 826
finds that the composite is the resulting version of the section 827
in effect prior to the effective date of the section as 828
presented in this act. 829